Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 30 Nuisances

11-30-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter and chapter 1 of title 10, the terms “nuisance or common nuisance”, “person”, or “place” are defined as follows:

“Nuisance” or “common nuisance” means and includes any place as defined in this section in or upon which lewdness, assignation, or prostitution is conducted, permitted, continued, or exists, and the personal property used in conducting or maintaining any place for that purpose, and all buildings, places, or tenements used as houses of ill fame, for illegal gaming, or where intemperate, idle, dissolute, noisy, or disorderly persons are in the habit of resorting;

“Person” includes any individual, corporation, association, partnership, trustee, lessee, agent, or assignee; and

“Place” includes any building, structure, or tenement, or any separate part or portion of a building or structure, or the ground itself.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1858, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-1

.

11-30-2.
Unlicensed manufacture or distribution of intoxicating liquor.

All buildings, places, tenements, vehicles, or vessels used for the manufacture for sale, the transportation for sale, the sale, or the keeping for sale, of intoxicating liquor for beverage purposes are declared to be common nuisances unless it shall be used, manufactured, kept for sale, or sold under a validly existing license issued for that purpose by some board, body, or official authorized to issue it.

“Liquor” or “intoxicating liquor” means any liquid fit for beverage purposes containing more than three and two-tenths per cent (3.2%) of alcohol by weight.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1858, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2045, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-2

.

11-30-3.
Penalty for common nuisance.

Every person keeping or maintaining any common nuisance enumerated in §

11-30-1

shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and be imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than three (3) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 2, G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 1928, ch. 1176, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1858, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-3

.

11-30-4.
Penalty for nuisance involving intoxicating liquors.

Every person keeping or maintaining any common nuisance enumerated in §

11-30-2

, or aiding in so doing, shall for the first offense be punished by a fine of not more than six hundred dollars ($600), and for a second and each subsequent offense shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or be imprisoned for not more than two (2) years in the adult correctional institutions, or both, in the discretion of the court. Money arising from fines imposed under this section shall be paid one-half (1/2) to the general treasurer of the state and one-half (1/2) to the treasurer of the town or city where the offense occurred.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 1928, ch. 1176, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1858, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 291, § 1.

11-30-5.
Evidence as to intoxicating liquors.

It shall not be necessary to prove an actual sale of intoxicating liquors in any building, place, or tenement, in order to establish the character of such premises as a common nuisance as provided in §

11-30-2

The notorious character of any premises, the notoriously bad or intemperate character of persons visiting them, the keeping of the implements or appurtenances usually appertaining to grog-shops, tippling-shops, or places where intoxicating liquors are sold, shall be evidence that the premises are nuisances within the meaning of §§

11-30-1

and

11-30-2

. Evidence of the sale or keeping of intoxicating liquors for sale in any building, place or tenement shall be evidence that the sale or keeping is illegal, and that the premises are nuisances within the meaning of §§

11-30-1

and 11-30-2.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-5

.

11-30-6.
Annulment of lease by maintenance of nuisance.

If any person, being a tenant or occupant under any lawful title of any building or tenement not owned by him or her, shall use the premises or any part for any of the purposes enumerated in §§

11-30-1

and

11-30-2

, that use shall annul the lease or other title under which the occupant holds, and, without any act of the owner, shall cause the right of possession to revert and vest in him or her, and the owner may make immediate entry on it and repossess himself or herself of the premises without process of law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-6

.

Participation by Lessor.

Where a tenant permits his lessor to use the property for illegal sale of intoxicating liquors upon agreement that rental payments will be waived, the landlord cannot treat the agreement as void where the tenant does not participate in the illegal acts of the landlord. Allen v. Keilly,

18 R.I. 197

, 30 A. 965,

1893 R.I. LEXIS 84

(1893).

The fact that lessor caused its employees to purchase whisky from lessee in order to obtain proof of illegal sales did not prevent cancelation of the lease. Guay Bros. v. Gauvreau,

47 R.I. 400

, 133 A. 797,

1926 R.I. LEXIS 72

(1926).

11-30-7.
Landlord’s liability for nuisance.

Every person who shall let any building or tenement owned by him or her or under his or her control, for any of the purposes enumerated in §§

11-30-1

and

11-30-2

, or who shall knowingly permit any building, tenement, or part of one to be so used while under his or her control, or who shall after five (5) days notice from any officer or magistrate of that use of the building or tenement omit to take all reasonable measures to eject the tenant or occupant from the premises as soon as it may lawfully be done, shall be deemed and taken to be guilty of aiding in the maintenance of the nuisance, and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions not less than sixty (60) days nor more than one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-7

.

11-30-8.
Entry by police officers of premises — Commanding departure of persons found.

The sheriffs of the several counties and their deputies, and the town sergeants, constables, and chiefs of police of the several towns and cities may, within their respective towns and counties, enter any house or building that they have cause to suspect to be inhabited for purposes of prostitution and lewdness, to be resorted to by persons of ill fame or by persons of dissolute, idle, or disorderly character, or in which they have reasonable cause to believe intoxicating liquors are sold in violation of law, or unlawful games are carried on or permitted, or in which they have reasonable cause to believe a common nuisance is kept or maintained. Upon entering the house or building, they may command all persons assembled there to immediately depart from the house or building. In the event of the neglect or refusal of any person so commanded to leave, they may arrest that person and hold him or her for a period not exceeding twenty-four (24) hours for prosecution. Every person who shall so refuse or neglect shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-8

; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 15; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 15.

11-30-9.
Officers commanding aid in execution.

Any of the officers referred to in §

11-30-8

may command aid in the execution of the authority conferred to them by that section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 92, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-9

.

11-30-10.
Unlawful sale of beverages by club or association.

All buildings, places, or tenements located within any town or city used by any club or other association, whether incorporated or not, for the purpose of selling, distributing, or dispensing intoxicating liquors to its members or others for beverage purposes, shall be deemed to be common nuisances, unless it shall be used for the sale, distribution, or dispensing of intoxicating or alcoholic beverages to its members under a validly existing license issued for that purpose by some board, body or official authorized to issue it. Whoever keeps, maintains, or assists in keeping or maintaining, a common nuisance shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and all costs of prosecution and conviction. Upon the conviction of any incorporated club or association or any officer, member, agent, or employee, under the provisions of this chapter, the charter of the club or association shall become null and void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1235, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 108, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-10

.

11-30-11.
Injunction.

Any person who shall use, occupy, establish, or conduct a nuisance, or aid or abet in it, either as principal or as the agent of any other person, shall be guilty of maintaining a nuisance and shall be enjoined as provided in chapter 1 of title 10.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-11

.

11-30-12.
Slaughterhouses, rendering plants, garbage plants, and brick kilns.

All buildings, places, or lands used as slaughterhouses, rendering establishments, garbage plants, or brick kilns, and located within three hundred (300) feet of any public park or public hospital, are declared to be common nuisances. This section shall not apply to any slaughterhouse or rendering establishment previously located by the proper authorities of any city or town. Every person who shall maintain any common nuisance of this type shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1240, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1906, ch. 1345, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 109, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 122, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 600, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-12

.

11-30-13.
Burning of decaying and waste substances.

No owner, lessee, or occupant of any land used or suffered to be used as a dumping ground shall burn or suffer to be burned on it, and no other person shall ignite or burn on it, any refuse or decaying animal, fish or vegetable substances, or any waste materials or substances of any kind, in any manner that the burning shall be a nuisance to any person or persons owning or occupying any adjoining or neighboring land. Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1523, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 109, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 122, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 600, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-30-13

.